apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="entfl/iehen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>iehend</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehen</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehen</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehen</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehen</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehen</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehen</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehe</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehe</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehe</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehest</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehet</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieh</l>       <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iehst</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieht</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieht</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieht</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ohen</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ohen</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öhen</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öhen</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ohen</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öhe</l>       <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öhe</l>       <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öhest</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öhet</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oh</l>        <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oh</l>        <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ohst</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oht</l>       <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="entr/eißen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eißend</l>    <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiße</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiße</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiße</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißest</l>    <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißet</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiß</l>       <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißt</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißt</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißt</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eißt</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issen</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isse</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isse</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>issest</l>    <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isset</l>     <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iss</l>       <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iss</l>       <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isst</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isst</l>      <r>eißen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="entfliehen">      <i>entfl</i><par n="entfl/iehen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entreißen">       <i>entr</i><par n="entr/eißen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="umreißen">        <i>umr</i><par n="entr/eißen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verreißen">       <i>verr</i><par n="entr/eißen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verschleißen">    <i>verschl</i><par n="entr/eißen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zerreißen">       <i>zerr</i><par n="entr/eißen__vblex"/></e>
